Maryland, session 2026, SB0906.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
5–602.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “DISTRIBUTE” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE SHARING OF
HEROIN OR FENTANYL OR A CHEMICAL ANALOGUE OF HEROIN OR FENTANYL
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0906*

SENATE BILL 906
WITHOUT REMUNERATION.
(B) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A DEFENDANT WHO IS
CONVICTED OF A VIOLATION OF § 5–602 OR § 5–603 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR AN ACT
THAT RESULTED IN THE DEATH OR SERIOUS BODILY INJURY TO THE VICTIM.
(2) THIS SECTION APPLIES REGARDLESS OF WHETHER:
(I) THE DEATH OR SERIOUS BODILY INJURY TO ANOTHER
OCCURRED AS A RESULT OF USING HEROIN OR FENTANYL OR A CHEMICAL
ANALOGUE OF HEROIN OR FENTANYL BY ITSELF OR COMBINED WITH ANY
COMPOUND, MIXTURE, DILUENT, OR OTHER SUBSTANCE;
(II) THE HEROIN OR FENTANYL OR THE CHEMICAL ANALOGUE
OF HEROIN OR FENTANYL IS MIXED OR COMBINED WITH ANY COMPOUND, MIXTURE,
DILUENT, OR OTHER SUBSTANCE AFTER THE VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION OCCURS; OR
(III) THE DISTRIBUTION OF HEROIN OR FENTANYL OR THE
CHEMICAL ANALOGUE OF HEROIN OR FENTANYL IS MADE DIRECTLY TO THE PERSON
WHO DIES OR SUFFERS SERIOUS BODILY INJURY.
(C) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS TITLE, A PERSON MAY NOT
DISTRIBUTE HEROIN OR FENTANYL OR A CHEMICAL ANALOGUE OF HEROIN OR
FENTANYL WITHOUT THE LAWFUL AUTHORITY TO DO SO, THE USE OF WHICH
RESULTS IN THE DEATH OF OR SERIOUS BODILY INJURY TO ANOTHER.
(D) IF POSSESSION OF HEROIN OR FENTANYL OR A CHEMICAL ANALOGUE
OF HEROIN OR FENTANYL IS TRANSFERRED MORE THAN ONCE BEFORE THE
OCCURRENCE OF THE DEATH OR SERIOUS BODILY INJURY, EACH PERSON WHO
DISTRIBUTED OR DELIVERED THE HEROIN, FENTANYL, OR THE CHEMICAL
ANALOGUE OF HEROIN OR FENTANYL SHALL BE CONSIDERED TO HAVE VIOLATED
THIS SECTION.
(E) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND,
IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PENALTY IMPOSED FOR A VIOLATION OF § 5–602 OR §
5–603 OF THIS SUBTITLE, ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 20 YEARS.
(F) A SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSECUTIVE
TO AND NOT CONCURRENT WITH ANOTHER SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER ANY OTHER
PROVISION OF LAW.

SENATE BILL 906 3
Article – Criminal Procedure
4–201.
(J) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, A PROSECUTION
OF A PERSON FOR A VIOLATION OF § 5–602.1 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE MAY
BE BROUGHT IN:
(1) THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE VIOLATION OCCURRED; OR
(2) THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE DEATH OR SERIOUS BODILY INJURY
OCCURRED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.